District of Columbia statutes.
16-2338

Emergency medical treatment.

Nothing in this subchapter shall prevent a public agency having custody of a child who is under jurisdiction of the Division from providing the child with emergency medical treatment.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 543, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 408(a), 24 DCR 3341
1981 Ed., § 16-2338.
1973 Ed., § 16-2338.